Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 165. Confession of Judgment

§ 4671.
Justice may take confession of judgment.

A justice may accept and record a confession of a debt to a creditor made by a debtor personally, either with or without antecedent process, as the parties shall agree, and render judgment on such confession; but such judgment shall not be rendered except upon a specification in writing filed with such justice, setting forth the claim upon which the judgment is rendered.

Parties.

One partner alone cannot legally confess judgment against the firm. James A. Shedd & Co. v. Bank of Brattleboro, 32 Vt. 709, 1860 Vt. LEXIS 30 (1860).

§ 4672.
Effect on attachments.

A judgment so rendered by confession, after the commencement of the suit, shall have the same effect to hold property attached or bail taken on mesne process, as if judgment had been rendered in the ordinary course of proceedings; but a confession of judgment by a debtor, after an action commenced against him or her, shall not be effectual to hold property attached where the same property has been subsequently attached by other creditors, as against them, unless the consent of all subsequent attaching creditors to such confession has been previously obtained in writing.

§ 4673.
Trustee actions.

In an action in which a trustee is summoned, the plaintiff may accept the tender of confession of judgment by the defendant therein without prejudice to such action.
Upon filing the same in court, the cause shall proceed as if it were made in open court.